apertium-quc.quc.lexc
LEXICON Pers

in%<prn%>%<pro%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:in # ;
at%<prn%>%<pro%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:at # ;
lal%<prn%>%<pro%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:lal # ;
areʼ%<prn%>%<pro%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:areʼ # ;
areʼ%<prn%>%<pro%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:are # ; ! Src/UTexas
! fixme: comprueba las reglas para -oj/-uj
oj%<prn%>%<pro%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:oj # ;
uj%<prn%>%<pro%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:uj # ;
ix%<prn%>%<pro%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:ix # ;
e%<prn%>%<pro%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:e # ;

in%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:in # ;
at%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:at # ;
lal%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:lal # ;
areʼ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:areʼ # ;
areʼ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:are # ; ! Src/UTexas
! FIXME: Comprueba las reglas para -oj/-uj
oj%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:oj # ;
uj%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:uj # ;
ix%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:ix # ;
alaq%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:alaq # ;
aʼre%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:aʼre # ;
arʼeʼ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:arʼeʼ # ;
eʼarʼeʼ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:eʼarʼeʼ # ;
eʼarʼeʼ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:eʼareʼ # ;
eʼare%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:eʼare # ;
eʼarʼeʼ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:e% areʼ # ;

LEXICON Num

%<num%>: # ;

LEXICON Num-Ord

%<num%>%<ord%>: # ;

LEXICON Pron-jasuch

%<prn%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON Pron-waʼ

%<prn%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON CS
%<cnjsub%>: # ;

LEXICON CC
%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-Top
%<np%>%<top%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-Cog
%<np%>%<cog%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-Al
%<np%>%<al%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-Top-Barb
%<np%>%<top%>%<barb%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-Ant-M
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-Ant-F
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON SS-OQ-A

%+oq%<aux%>:%>oq             # ;
%+a%<aux%>%<fin%>:%>a        # ;

LEXICON SS-IK-Ø

%+ik%<aux%>:%>%{i%}k         # ;
@R.SS@:@R.SS@                 # ; ! ---

LEXICON SS-Vʼ-V
! On root transitives, this suffix has the form -Vʼ at the end of the
! intonational phrase (-uʼ and -oʼ in harmony with a preceding u or o
! and -aʼ in the other cases) and -V in other positions.
%+uʼ%<aux%>:%>%{U%}ʼ         # ;
%+uʼ%<aux%>%<fin%>:%>%{U%}   # ;

LEXICON SS-OU-Ø
! this suffix is -u on root transitives when the root
! vowel is u and -o when the root vowel is not u.
%+u%<aux%>:%>%{O%}           # ;
@R.SS@:@R.SS@                 # ; ! ---

LEXICON SS-TV-R

@U.SS.Dep@:@U.SS.Dep@         SS-Vʼ-V ;
@U.SS.Ind@:@U.SS.Ind@         SS-OU-Ø ;

LEXICON SS-IV

@U.SS.Dep@:@U.SS.Dep@         SS-OQ-A ;
@U.SS.Ind@:@U.SS.Ind@         SS-IK-Ø ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON TAM1

@P.Pref.ON@:@P.Pref.ON@                  TAM2 ;
@P.AGR.A@:@P.AGR.A@                      A-TV ;
@P.AGR.A@:@P.AGR.A@                      A-IV ;
@P.AGR.B@:@P.AGR.B@                      B-IV ;
                                         TV ;
                                         IV ;

LEXICON TAM2

@U.SS.Ind@%<impf%>:@U.SS.Ind@k           B ;
@U.SS.Ind@%<impf%>:@U.SS.Ind@k%{a%}      B ; ! Src/UTexas ! FIXME
@U.SS.Ind@%<perf%>:@U.SS.Ind@x           B ;
@U.SS.Dep@%<imp%>:@U.SS.Dep@ch           B ;
@U.SS.Dep@%<imp%>%<mov%>:@U.SS.Dep@j     B ;
@U.SS.Ind@%<imp%>%<neg%>:@U.SS.Ind@m     B ;

LEXICON B

@U.VAL.1@:@U.VAL.1@                      B-IV ;
@U.VAL.2@:@U.VAL.2@                      B-TV ;

LEXICON B-IV

%<s_sg1%>:%>in                    MOV-IV;
%<s_sg2%>:%>at                    MOV-IV;
%<s_sg3%>:%>                      MOV-IV;
%<s_pl1%>:%>oj                    MOV-IV;
%<s_pl1%>:%>uj                    MOV-IV; ! Dial/?
%<s_pl2%>:%>ix                    MOV-IV;
%<s_pl3%>:%>e                     MOV-IV;

LEXICON B-TV

%<o_sg1%>:%>in                    MOV-TV;
%<o_sg2%>:%>at                    MOV-TV;
%<o_sg3%>:%>                      MOV-TV;
%<o_pl1%>:%>oj                    MOV-TV;
%<o_pl1%>:%>uj                    MOV-TV; ! Dial/?
%<o_pl2%>:%>ix                    MOV-TV;
%<o_pl3%>:%>e                     MOV-TV;

LEXICON MOV-IV

@P.SS.Dep@%<lat%>:@P.SS.Dep@%>ul                   IV ;
@P.SS.Dep@%<lat%>:@P.SS.Dep@%>ol                   IV ; ! Src/CanPixabaj ! Dir/LR
@P.SS.Dep@%<abl%>:@P.SS.Dep@%>eʼ                   IV ;
@P.SS.Dep@%<abl%>:@P.SS.Dep@%>bʼe                  IV ;
@U.SS.Dep@:@U.SS.Dep@                              IV-PASS ; ! <imp>
@U.SS.Ind@:@U.SS.Ind@                              IV-PASS ; ! <impf>/<perf>
@D.SS@:@D.SS@                            IV-PASS ;

LEXICON IV-PASS

                                         IV ;
@U.VAL.1@:@U.VAL.1@                      TV ;

LEXICON MOV-TV

@P.SS.Dep@%<lat%>:@P.SS.Dep@%>ul                   A-TV ;
@P.SS.Dep@%<lat%>:@P.SS.Dep@%>ol                   A-TV ; ! Src/CanPixabaj ! Dir/LR
@P.SS.Dep@%<abl%>:@P.SS.Dep@%>eʼ                   A-TV ;
@P.SS.Dep@%<abl%>:@P.SS.Dep@%>bʼe                  A-TV ;
@U.SS.Ind@:@U.SS.Ind@                  A-TV ;
@U.SS.Dep@:@U.SS.Dep@                  A-TV ; ! <imp>
@D.SS@:@D.SS@                          A-TV ;

! For non-finite forms
LEXICON A-IV

! ssg1 can also be -nu-, e.g. xenuwilo

%<s_sg1%>:%>in%{w%}    IV;     ! in inw
%<s_sg2%>:%>a%{w%}     IV;     ! a  aw
%<s_sg3%>:%>%{r%}      IV;     ! u  r
%<s_pl1%>:%>q%{a%}     IV;     ! qa q
%<s_pl2%>:%>i%{w%}     IV;     ! i  iw
%<s_pl3%>:%>k%{i%}     IV;     ! ki k

LEXICON A-TV

! ssg1 can also be -nu-, e.g. xenuwilo

%<s_sg1%>:%>in%{w%}    TV;     ! in inw !! FIXME: ^xatwilo/x>at>w>il>o$
%<s_sg2%>:%>a%{w%}     TV;     ! a  aw
%<s_sg3%>:%>%{r%}      TV;     ! u  r
%<s_pl1%>:%>q%{a%}     TV;     ! qa q
%<s_pl2%>:%>i%{w%}     TV;     ! i  iw
%<s_pl3%>:%>k%{i%}     TV;     ! ki k

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON TV-R-NONFIN

@D.AGR.B@@D.SS@%<inf%>:@D.AGR.B@@D.SS@%>ik                    # ;
@D.SS@%<pp%>:@D.SS@%>%{O%}m                                   # ;

LEXICON TV-D-NONFIN

@D.AGR.B@@D.SS@%<inf%>:@D.AGR.B@@D.SS@%>ik                    # ;
@D.SS@%<pp%>:@D.SS@%>m                                        # ;

LEXICON TV-PASS-NONFIN

@D.AGR.B@@D.SS@%<inf%>:@D.AGR.B@@D.SS@%>ik                    # ;

LEXICON TV-ANTI-NONFIN

@D.AGR.B@@D.SS@%<inf%>:@D.AGR.B@@D.SS@%>ik                    # ;
@D.AGR.B@@D.SS@%<inf%>:@D.AGR.B@@D.SS@%>em                    # ;
@D.SS@%<pp%>:@D.SS@%>inaq                                     # ;
@D.SS@%<pp%>:@D.SS@%>naq                                     # ; ! Use/Spell ! Src/UDHR

LEXICON IV-NONFIN

@D.AGR.B@@D.SS@%<inf%>:@D.AGR.B@@D.SS@%>ik                    # ;
@D.AGR.B@@D.SS@%<inf%>:@D.AGR.B@@D.SS@%>%{V%}m                # ;
@D.SS@%<pp%>:@D.SS@%>inaq                                     # ;
@D.SS@%<pp%>:@D.SS@%>naq                                     # ; ! Use/Spell ! Src/UDHR

LEXICON TV-R-VAL

@D.SS@%<pass%>:@D.SS@                                      TV-PASS-NONFIN  ;
@R.Pref.ON@%<pass%>:@R.Pref.ON@                            SS-IV ;
%<pass%>%<stat%>:%>%{V%}taj                                TV-PASS-NONFIN  ; ! riqitaj
@R.Pref.ON@%<pass%>%<stat%>:@R.Pref.ON@%>%{V%}taj          SS-IV ;
%<pass%>%<stat%>:%>taj                                     TV-PASS-NONFIN  ; ! bʼantaj (not bʼanataj?)
@R.Pref.ON@%<pass%>%<stat%>:@R.Pref.ON@%>taj               SS-IV ;           ! bʼantaj (not bʼanataj?)
@D.SS@%<anti%>:@D.SS@%>%{U%}n                              TV-ANTI-NONFIN  ;
@R.Pref.ON@%<anti%>:@R.Pref.ON@%>%{U%}n                    SS-IV ;
@R.Pref.ON@%<anti%>%<agfoc%>:@R.Pref.ON@%>%{O%}w           SS-IV  ;

LEXICON TV-D-VAL

@D.SS@%<pass%>:@D.SS@%>x                                   TV-PASS-NONFIN  ;
@R.Pref.ON@%<pass%>:@R.Pref.ON@%>x                         SS-IV ;
%<pass%>%<stat%>:%>taj                                     TV-PASS-NONFIN  ;
@R.Pref.ON@%<pass%>%<stat%>:@R.Pref.ON@%>taj               SS-IV ;
@D.SS@%<anti%>:@D.SS@%>n                                   TV-ANTI-NONFIN  ;
@R.Pref.ON@%<anti%>:@R.Pref.ON@%>n                         SS-IV ;
@R.Pref.ON@%<anti%>%<agfoc%>:@R.Pref.ON@%>n                SS-IV  ;

LEXICON Propios
Totonicapán:Totonicapan NP-Top ;
Nahuala:Nahuala NP-Top ;
Qʼantel:Qʼantel NP-Top ;
Chipi:Chipi NP-Top ;
Chuatroj:Chuatroj NP-Top ;
Nawaljaʼ:Nawaljaʼ NP-Top ;
Neʼapolis:Neʼapolis NP-Top ;
Efeso:Efeso NP-Top ;
Xeljuʼ:Xeljuʼ NP-Top ;
Utatlán:Utatlán NP-Top ;
Naʼ:Naʼ NP-Ant-F ;
Niʼl:Niʼl NP-Ant-F ;
Ixchel:Ixchel NP-Ant-F ;
Triʼx:Triʼx NP-Ant-M ;
Waʼn:Waʼn NP-Ant-F ;
Nela:Nela NP-Ant-F ;
Mariy:Mariy NP-Ant-F ;
Batz:Batz NP-Cog ;
Ajpop:Ajpop NP-Cog ; ! ""
Ajtzʼalam:Ajtzʼalam NP-Cog ; ! ""
Ajuʼ:Ajuʼ NP-Cog ; ! ""
Chan:Chan NP-Cog ; ! ""
Chun:Chun NP-Cog ; ! ""
Chuta:Chuta NP-Cog ; ! ""
Ixchobʼ:Ixchobʼ NP-Cog ; ! ""
Pum:Pum NP-Cog ; ! ""
Suʼy:Suʼy NP-Cog ; ! ""
Tax:Tax NP-Cog ; ! ""
Tzʼaläm:Tzʼaläm NP-Cog ; ! ""
Tzʼul:Tzʼul NP-Cog ; ! ""
Yak:Yak NP-Cog ; ! ""
Yay:Yay NP-Cog ; ! ""
Migueʼl:Migueʼl NP-Ant-M ;
Akaʼiko:Akaʼiko NP-Ant-M ; ! ""
Bʼartolome:Bʼartolome NP-Ant-M ;
Gedeʼon:Gedeʼon NP-Ant-M ; ! ""
Jose:Jose NP-Ant-M ;
Wel:Wel NP-Ant-M ;
Pedro:Pedro NP-Ant-M ;
Saʼulo:Saʼulo NP-Ant-M ;
Marta:Marta NP-Ant-F ;
Susana:Susana NP-Ant-F ;
Consulting:Consulting NP-Al ;
COVID:COVID NP-Al ;
5G:5G NP-Al ;
nCOV:nCOV NP-Al ;
COVID-19:COVID-19 NP-Al ;
DiseasesDB:DiseasesDB NP-Al ;
HIV:HIV NP-Al ;
HUAWEI8:HUAWEI8 NP-Al ;
LLC:LLC NP-Al ;
OMS:OMS NP-Al ;
Bretonneau:Bretonneau NP-Cog ;
Guillian:Guillian NP-Cog ;
Chagas:Chagas NP-Cog ;
Ramon:Ramon NP-Ant-M ;
Microsoft:Microsoft NP-Al ;
Apocalypto:Apocalypto NP-Al ;
Qʼaxebʼal:Qʼaxebʼal NP-Al ;
Paskuʼa:Paskuʼa NP-Al ;
Sanedrin:Sanedrin NP-Al ;
USAID:USAID NP-Al ;
Olivo:Olivo NP-Top ;
Maʼa:Maʼa NP-Top ; ! "Zacualpa"
Xelajuʼ:Xelajuʼ NP-Top ; ! "Quetzaltenango"
Mejoral:Mejoral NP-Al ; ! "Guatemalan brand name for aspirin"
Cheʼp:Cheʼp NP-Ant-F ; ! "Josefa"
Mariʼy:Mariʼy NP-Ant-F ; ! "María"
Tebʼuʼr:Tebʼuʼr NP-Ant-F ; ! "Tiburcia"
Tun:Tun NP-Ant-M ; ! "Antonio"
Bʼetsaʼida:Bʼetsaʼida NP-Top ;
Artemis:Artemis NP-Ant-M ;
Salome:Salome NP-Ant-F ;
Arabʼiʼa:Arabʼiʼa NP-Top ;
Aristarko:Aristarko NP-Ant-M ; ! ""
Bʼetfage:Bʼetfage NP-Top ; ! "Betfagué"
Salatiʼel:Salatiʼel NP-Ant-M ; ! "Salatiel"
Epafras:Epafras NP-Ant-M ; ! "Epafras"
Esli:Esli NP-Ant-M ; ! ""
Mattat:Mattat NP-Ant-M ; ! ""
Sala:Sala NP-Ant-M ; ! ""
Tecun:Tecun NP-Ant-M ; ! ""
Umán:Umán NP-Cog ; ! ""
Tiro:Tiro NP-Top ;
Omega:Omega NP-Al ;
Alfa:Alfa NP-Al ;
Selotes:Selotes NP-Al ;
Prissila:Prissila NP-Ant-F ;
Paraʼiso:Paraʼiso NP-Top ;
Mesiʼas:Mesiʼas NP-Al ;
Lusiʼo:Lusiʼo NP-Ant-M ;
Esmirna:Esmirna NP-Top ;
Eliʼud:Eliʼud NP-Ant-M ;
Aser:Aser NP-Al ;
Ninfas:Ninfas NP-Ant-F ;
Sergiʼo:Sergiʼo NP-Ant-M ;
Patmos:Patmos NP-Top ; 
Ajtzʼalam:Ajtzʼalam NP-Cog  ;
Amaqʼ:Amaqʼ NP-Al ;
Bʼokoʼ:Bʼokoʼ NP-Top ;
Chana:Chana NP-Ant-F  ;
Chan:Chan NP-Cog ;
Chuta:Chuta NP-Cog ;
COVID-19:COVID-19 NP-Al  ;
Jordan:Jordan NP-Top  ;
Junamil:Junamil NP-Al ;
Juʼl:Juʼl NP-Ant-F ;
Kulax:Kulax NP-Ant-M ;
Leʼn:Leʼn NP-Ant-F  ;
Luʼs:Luʼs NP-Ant-F ;
Mariʼy:Mariʼy NP-Ant-F  ;
Nabʼajul:Nabʼajul NP-Top ;
nCOV:nCOV NP-Al  ;
Nela:Nela NP-Ant-F  ;
Pal:Pal NP-Ant-M  ;
Pum:Pum NP-Cog ;
Qʼumarkaj:Qʼumarkaj NP-Top  ;
Roʼs:Roʼs NP-Ant-F  ;
Talin:Talin NP-Ant-F ;
Tax:Tax NP-Cog ;
Teʼy:Teʼy NP-Ant-F  ;
Trix:Trix NP-Ant-M ;
Tzʼoloj:Tzʼoloj NP-Top ;
Waʼn:Waʼn NP-Ant-F ;
Weʼt:Weʼt NP-Ant-F  ;
Xoʼl:Xoʼl NP-Top  ;
Xpeʼr:Xpeʼr NP-Ant-F  ;
Xwan:Xwan NP-Ant-M ;
Yak:Yak NP-Cog ;
Yay:Yay NP-Cog ;
LEXICON Barbarisms
Africa:Africa NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
Canada:Canada NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
América:América NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
America:America NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
Argentina:Argentina NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
Asia:Asia NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
Australia:Australia NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
Bolivia:Bolivia NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
Brasil:Brasil NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
Chile:Chile NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
Colombia:Colombia NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
Congo:Congo NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
Cuenca:Cuenca NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
Escocia:Escocia NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
Europa:Europa NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
España:España NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
Grecia:Grecia NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
Guatemala:Guatemala NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
Guinea:Guinea NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
India:India NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
Liberia:Liberia NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
Man:Man NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
Nigeria:Nigeria NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
Sudán:Sudán NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
Uganda:Uganda NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
Wisconsin:Wisconsin NP-Top-Barb ; ! ""
